Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 14 Education of Teachers [Repealed.]

16-14-1 — 16-14-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 63, §§ 9, 17, and 18; P.L. 1912, ch. 839, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 84, §§ 8-10; G.L. 1923, ch. 65, § 18; P.L. 1932, ch. 1950, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1923, ch. 84, §§ 14-16; P.L. 1938, ch. 2575, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 176, §§ 8-11, 15-17; G.L. 1938, ch. 176, § 18; P.L. 1943, ch. 1354, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3040, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3368, § 3; G.L. 1956, §§

16-14-1

— 16-14-6; P.L. 1957, ch. 69, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 6; P.L. 1980, ch. 395, § 1.